data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.aff
SFX n   0       am-nas         erzir
SFX n   0       am-no          erzir
SFX n   0       am-nos         erzir
SFX n   0       am-se          erzir
SFX n   0       am-te          erzir
SFX n   0       am-vos         erzir
SFX n   0       -lhe-ão        erzir
SFX n   0       -lhes-ão       erzir
SFX n   0       -me-ão         erzir
SFX n   0       -na-ão         erzir
SFX n   0       -nas-ão        erzir
SFX n   0       -no-ão         erzir
SFX n   0       -nos-ão        erzir
SFX n   0       -se-ão         erzir
SFX n   0       -te-ão         erzir
SFX n   0       -vos-ão        erzir
SFX n   0       -lhe-ás        erzir
SFX n   0       -lhes-ás       erzir
SFX n   0       -me-ás         erzir
SFX n   0       -nos-ás        erzir
SFX n   0       -se-ás         erzir
SFX n   0       -te-ás         erzir
SFX n   0       -vos-ás        erzir
SFX n   0       -lhe-ei        erzir
SFX n   0       -lhes-ei       erzir
SFX n   0       -me-ei         erzir
SFX n   0       -nos-ei        erzir
SFX n   0       -se-ei         erzir
SFX n   0       -te-ei         erzir
SFX n   0       -vos-ei        erzir
SFX n   0       em-lhe         erzir
SFX n   0       em-lhes        erzir
SFX n   0       em-me          erzir
SFX n   0       em-na          erzir
SFX n   0       em-nas         erzir
SFX n   0       em-no          erzir
SFX n   0       em-nos         erzir
SFX n   0       em-se          erzir
SFX n   0       em-te          erzir
SFX n   0       em-vos         erzir
SFX n   0       -la-emos       erzir
SFX n   0       -las-emos      erzir
SFX n   0       -lhe-emos      erzir
SFX n   0       -lhes-emos     erzir
SFX n   0       -lo-emos       erzir
SFX n   0       -los-emos      erzir
SFX n   0       -nos-emos      erzir
SFX n   0       -te-emos       erzir
SFX n   0       -vos-emos      erzir
SFX n   0       -lhe-ia        erzir
SFX n   0       -lhes-ia       erzir
SFX n   0       -me-ia         erzir
SFX n   0       -nos-ia        erzir
SFX n   0       -se-ia         erzir
SFX n   0       -te-ia         erzir
SFX n   0       -vos-ia        erzir
SFX n   0       -lhe-iam       erzir
SFX n   0       -lhes-iam      erzir
SFX n   0       -me-iam        erzir
SFX n   0       -nos-iam       erzir
SFX n   0       -se-iam        erzir
SFX n   0       -te-iam        erzir
SFX n   0       -vos-iam       erzir
SFX n   0       íamo-nos       erzir
SFX n   0       íamos-vos       erzir
SFX n   0       íamos-lhe      erzir
SFX n   0       íamos-lhes     erzir
SFX n   0       íamos-te       erzir
SFX n   0       mo-nos         erzir
SFX n   0       mos-vos         erzir
SFX n   0       mos-lhe        erzir
SFX n   0       mos-lhes       erzir
SFX n   0       mos-te         erzir
SFX n   r       sse-a          erzir
SFX n   r       sse-as         erzir
SFX n   r       sse-lhe        erzir
SFX n   r       sse-lhes       erzir
SFX n   r       sse-me         erzir
SFX n   r       sse-nos        erzir
SFX n   r       sse-o          erzir
SFX n   r       sse-os         erzir
SFX n   r       sse-se         erzir
SFX n   r       sse-te         erzir
SFX n   r       sse-vos        erzir
SFX n   r       ssem-lhe       erzir
SFX n   r       ssem-lhes      erzir
SFX n   r       ssem-me        erzir
SFX n   r       ssem-na        erzir
SFX n   r       ssem-nas       erzir
SFX n   r       ssem-no        erzir
SFX n   r       ssem-nos       erzir
SFX n   r       ssem-te        erzir
SFX n   r       ssem-vos       erzir
SFX n   r       ste-a          erzir
SFX n   r       ste-as         erzir
SFX n   r       ste-lhe        erzir
SFX n   r       ste-lhes       erzir
SFX n   r       ste-me         erzir
SFX n   r       ste-nos        erzir
SFX n   r       ste-o          erzir
SFX n   r       ste-os         erzir
SFX n   r       ste-se         erzir
SFX n   r       ste-te         erzir
SFX n   r       ste-vos        erzir
SFX n   r       u-a            erzir
SFX n   r       u-as           erzir
SFX n   r       u-lhe          erzir
SFX n   r       u-lhes         erzir
SFX n   r       u-me           erzir
SFX n   r       u-nos          erzir
SFX n   r       u-o            erzir
SFX n   r       u-os           erzir
SFX n   r       u-se           erzir
SFX n   r       u-te           erzir
SFX n   r       u-vos          erzir
SFX n   erzir   irza-a         erzir
SFX n   erzir   irza-as        erzir
SFX n   erzir   irza-lhe       erzir
SFX n   erzir   irza-lhes      erzir
SFX n   erzir   irza-me        erzir
SFX n   erzir   irza-o         erzir
SFX n   erzir   irza-os        erzir
SFX n   erzir   irza-se        erzir
SFX n   erzir   irza-te        erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-lhe      erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-lhes     erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-me       erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-na       erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-nas      erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-no       erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-nos      erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-se       erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-te       erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzam-vos      erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzamo-nos     erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzamos-vos     erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzamos-lhe    erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzamos-lhes   erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzamos-te     erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzo-a         erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzo-as        erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzo-lhe       erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzo-lhes      erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzo-me        erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzo-o         erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzo-os        erzir
SFX n   erzir   irzo-te        erzir
SFX n   r       do-a           ear
SFX n   r       do-as          ear
SFX n   r       do-lhe         ear
SFX n   r       do-lhes        ear
SFX n   r       do-me          ear
SFX n   r       do-nos         ear
SFX n   r       do-o           ear
SFX n   r       do-os          ear
SFX n   r       do-se          ear
SFX n   r       do-te          ear
SFX n   r       do-vos         ear
SFX n   r       i-a            ear
SFX n   r       i-as           ear
SFX n   r       i-lhe          ear
SFX n   r       i-lhes         ear
SFX n   r       i-me           ear
SFX n   r       i-nos          ear
SFX n   r       i-o            ear
SFX n   r       i-os           ear
SFX n   r       i-se           ear
SFX n   r       i-te           ear
SFX n   r       i-vos          ear
SFX n   r       mo-nos         ear
SFX n   r       mos-vos         ear
SFX n   r       mos-lhe        ear
SFX n   r       mos-lhes       ear
SFX n   r       mos-te         ear
SFX n   r       ndo-a          ear
SFX n   r       ndo-as         ear
SFX n   r       ndo-lhe        ear
SFX n   r       ndo-lhes       ear
SFX n   r       ndo-me         ear
SFX n   r       ndo-nos        ear
SFX n   r       ndo-o          ear
SFX n   r       ndo-os         ear
SFX n   r       ndo-se         ear
SFX n   r       ndo-te         ear
SFX n   r       ndo-vos        ear
SFX n   0       a-a            ear
SFX n   0       a-as           ear
SFX n   0       a-lhe          ear
SFX n   0       a-lhes         ear
SFX n   0       a-me           ear
SFX n   0       a-nos          ear
SFX n   0       a-o            ear
SFX n   0       a-os           ear
SFX n   0       a-se           ear
SFX n   0       a-te           ear
SFX n   0       a-vos          ear
SFX n   0       -la-á          ear
SFX n   0       -las-á         ear
SFX n   0       -lhe-á         ear
SFX n   0       -lhes-á        ear
SFX n   0       -lo-á          ear
SFX n   0       -los-á         ear
SFX n   0       -me-á          ear
SFX n   0       -nos-á         ear
SFX n   0       -se-á          ear
SFX n   0       -te-á          ear
SFX n   0       -vos-á         ear
SFX n   0       am-lhe         ear
SFX n   0       am-lhes        ear
SFX n   0       am-me          ear
SFX n   0       am-na          ear
SFX n   0       am-nas         ear
SFX n   0       am-no          ear
SFX n   0       am-nos         ear
SFX n   0       am-se          ear
SFX n   0       am-te          ear
SFX n   0       am-vos         ear
SFX n   0       -lhe-ão        ear
SFX n   0       -lhes-ão       ear
SFX n   0       -me-ão         ear
