data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.dic
açotear/dnYMjL
alcatear/dnYMjL
ambrear/dnYMjL
camear/dnYjL
cerzir/dnMjL
colmear/dnYMjL
eclodir/dnMjL
engolir/dnMjLÂ
entressorrir/dnMjL
erodir/dnMjL
estrear/dnYMjLÀ
estrepolir/dnMjL
explodir/dnMjL
expolir/dnMjL
idear/dnYjL
implodir/dnMjL
lonquear/dnYMjL
polir/dnMjLÀÂ
rebolir/dnMjL
rir/dnMjL
sorrir/dnMjLÂÀ
